Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3809
(UTC 109) Methods and waiver of notice.

(UTC 109) (a) Notice to a person under the Nebraska Uniform Trust Code or the sending of a document to a person under the code must be accomplished in a manner reasonably suitable under the circumstances and likely to result in receipt of the notice or document. Permissible methods of notice or for sending a document include first-class mail, personal delivery, delivery to the person's last-known place of residence or place of business, or a properly directed electronic message.

(b) Notice otherwise required under the code or a document otherwise required to be sent under the code need not be provided to a person whose identity or location is unknown to and not reasonably ascertainable by the trustee.

(c) Notice under the code or the sending of a document under the code may be waived by the person to be notified or sent the document.

(d) Notice of a judicial proceeding may be given as provided in the applicable rules of civil procedure or as in section 30-2220.

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 9.